California statutes. Public Resources Code
(6) (A) The lead agency shall give the supervisor at least 30 days’ notice of the time, place, and date of the hearing at which the reclamation plan or plan amendment is scheduled to be approved by the lead agency.

(B) If no hearing is required by this chapter, the local ordinance, or other state law, the lead agency shall provide 30 days’ notice to the supervisor that the lead agency intends to approve the reclamation plan or plan amendment.

(7) (A) Within 30 days following the approval of the reclamation plan or plan amendment, the lead agency shall provide the supervisor notice of the approval. During that period, the Division of Mine
 Reclamation retains all powers, duties, and authorities of this chapter. The lead agency shall provide, as soon as practicable but no later than 60 days after approval of the reclamation plan or plan amendment, certified copies of all maps, diagrams, or calculations, signed and sealed.

(B) No later than 60 days after the approval of the reclamation plan or plan amendment, the lead agency shall provide to the supervisor an official copy of the approved reclamation plan or plan amendment. The official copy shall incorporate all approved modifications to the reclamation plan or plan amendment and shall include an index showing any permit conditions of approval or binding mitigation measures adopted or certified pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) that are necessary to meet the requirements of
 subdivision (c) of Section 2772, Sections 2773 and 2773.3, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 3500) and Article 9 (commencing with Section 3700) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable. Those conditions of approval and mitigation measures shall be included in an appendix to the reclamation plan or plan amendment and shall be considered part of the reclamation compliance requirements and subject to the annual inspection requirements.

(c) To the extent there is a conflict between the comments of a trustee agency or a responsible agency that are based on that agency’s statutory or regulatory authority and the comments of other commenting agencies that are received by the lead agency pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with
 Section 21000)) regarding a reclamation plan or plan amendments, the lead agency shall consider only the comments of the trustee agency or responsible agency.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to limit or expand the Division of Mine Reclamation’s authority or responsibility to review a document in accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 36.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.5.

(a) A reclamation plan by any person who owns, leases, or otherwise controls or operates on all, or any portion of any, mined lands within the boundaries of the San Gabriel Basin Water Quality Authority, and who plans to conduct surface mining operations on those lands, in addition to the information required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2772, shall include a description of any programs necessary to monitor the effects of mining and reclamation operations on air, water, and soil quality, on the surrounding area, backfill characteristics, geologic conditions, and slope stability, similar to the California Environmental Quality Act document for the reclamation project.

(b) This section applies to activities otherwise subject to this chapter conducted within the boundaries of the San Gabriel Basin Water Quality Authority. To the extent of any conflict between this section and any other provision of this chapter, this section shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 515, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.6.

(a) In addition to meeting the requirements of Section 2773.1, the financial assurance cost estimate required of a surface mining operation within the boundaries of the San Gabriel Basin Water Quality Authority for any one year shall be in an amount not less than that required to ensure reclamation of the disturbed areas is completed in accordance with the approved reclamation plan.

(b) This section applies to activities otherwise subject to this chapter conducted within the boundaries of the San Gabriel Basin Water Quality Authority. To the extent of any conflict between this section and any other provision of this chapter, this section shall
 prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 37.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.7.

(a) A lead agency, upon approval of a reclamation plan or an amendment to a reclamation plan, shall record a “Notice of Reclamation Plan Approval” with the county recorder. The notice shall read: “Mining operations conducted on the hereinafter described real property are subject to a reclamation plan approved by the ____ (lead agency), a copy of which is on file with the ____.”

(b) In addition to the information required by subdivision (a), the notice shall also include the name of the owner of record of the mine operation, the name of the lead agency, and the acknowledged signature of the lead agency representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 208, Sec. 3.   (SB 833)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.

(a) The reclamation plan shall be applicable to a specific piece of property or properties, shall be based upon the character of the surrounding area and such characteristics of the property as type of overburden, soil stability, topography, geology, climate, stream characteristics, and principal mineral commodities, and shall establish site-specific criteria for evaluating compliance with the approved reclamation plan, including topography, revegetation and sediment, and erosion control.

(b) By January 1, 1992, the board shall adopt regulations specifying minimum, verifiable statewide reclamation standards. Subjects for which standards shall be set include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) Wildlife habitat.

(2) Backfilling, regrading, slope stability, and recontouring.

(3) Revegetation.

(4) Drainage, diversion structures, waterways, and erosion control.

(5) Prime and other agricultural land reclamation.

(6) Building, structure, and equipment removal.

(7) Stream protection.

(8) Topsoil salvage, maintenance, and redistribution.

(9) Tailing and mine waste management.

These standards shall apply to each mining operation, but only to the extent that they are consistent with the planned or actual subsequent use or uses of the mining site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1097, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.1.

(a) Lead agencies shall require financial assurances of each surface mining operation to ensure reclamation is performed in accordance with the surface mining operation’s approved reclamation plan, as follows:

(1) A financial assurance mechanism may take the form of surety bonds executed by an admitted surety insurer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 995.120 of the Code of Civil Procedure, irrevocable letters of credit, trust funds, or other forms of financial assurance mechanisms specified by the board pursuant to subdivision (e) that the lead agency reasonably determines are adequate to perform reclamation in accordance with the surface mining operation’s approved
 reclamation plan.

(2) Financial assurances shall remain in effect for the duration of the surface mining operation and any additional period until reclamation is completed.

(3) The amount of the financial assurance cost estimate required of a surface mining operation for any one year shall be reviewed and, if necessary, adjusted once each calendar year to account for new lands disturbed by surface mining operations, inflation, and reclamation of lands accomplished in accordance with the approved reclamation plan. An operator shall be required to replace an approved financial assurance mechanism to bond for the reclamation of the surface mining operation only if the financial assurance cost estimate identifies a need to increase the amount of the financial assurance
 mechanism.

(4) Financial assurance cost estimates shall be submitted to the lead agency for review on a form developed by the supervisor and approved by the board. The form shall be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(5) Each financial assurance mechanism shall be made payable to the lead agency and the department. A financial assurance mechanism shall not be released without the consent of the lead agency and the department. A financial assurance mechanism that was approved by the lead agency prior to January 1, 1993, and was made payable to the State Geologist shall be considered payable to the department for purposes of this chapter. However, if
 a surface mining operation has received approval of its financial assurance cost estimate from a public agency other than the lead agency, the lead agency shall deem those financial cost estimates adequate for purposes of this section, or shall credit them toward fulfillment of the financial cost estimate required by this section, if they are made payable to the public agency, the lead agency, and the department and otherwise meet the requirements of this section. In any event, if a lead agency and one or more public agencies exercise jurisdiction over a surface mining operation, the total amount of financial assurances required by the lead agency and the public agencies for any one year shall not exceed that amount that is necessary to perform reclamation of lands remaining disturbed. For purposes of this paragraph, a “public agency” may include a federal agency.

(b) (1) If the lead agency, or the board when acting as a lead agency, has evidence that an operator may be financially incapable of completing reclamation in accordance with its approved reclamation plan or that the operator may have abandoned the surface mining operation without completing reclamation, the lead agency or the board, when acting as a lead agency, shall conduct a public hearing to determine whether the operator is financially capable of completing reclamation in accordance with the approved reclamation plan or has abandoned the surface mining operation. The hearing shall be noticed to the operator and the supervisor at least 30 days prior to the hearing.

(2) If the lead agency or the board, following the public hearing conducted pursuant to
 paragraph (1), determines that the operator is financially incapable of performing reclamation in accordance with its approved reclamation plan or has abandoned its surface mining operation without completing reclamation, either the lead agency or the supervisor shall do all of the following:

(A) Notify the operator by personal service or certified mail that the lead agency or the supervisor intends to take appropriate action to forfeit the financial assurances and specify the reasons for so doing.

(B) Proceed to take appropriate action to require forfeiture of the financial assurance mechanisms.

(C) Use the proceeds from the forfeited financial assurance mechanisms to conduct and complete reclamation in accordance with
 the approved reclamation plan. If the surface mining operation cannot be reclaimed in accordance with its approved reclamation plan, or the financial assurance mechanisms are inadequate to reclaim in accordance with its approved reclamation plan, the lead agency or supervisor may use forfeited financial assurance mechanisms to reclaim or remediate mining disturbances as appropriate for the site conditions as determined by both the lead agency and the supervisor. The financial assurance mechanisms shall not be used for any other purpose. The operator is responsible for the costs of conducting and completing reclamation in accordance with the approved reclamation plan or a remediation plan developed pursuant to this section as determined appropriate by both the lead agency and the supervisor that are in excess of the proceeds from the forfeited financial assurance mechanisms.

(c) Financial assurances shall no longer be required of a surface mining operation, and shall be released, upon the written concurrence of the lead agency and the supervisor, which shall be forwarded to the operator and the institutions providing or holding the financial assurance mechanism, that reclamation has been completed in accordance with the approved reclamation plan. If a surface mining operation is sold or ownership is transferred to another person, the existing financial assurance mechanism shall remain in force and shall not be released by the lead agency and the supervisor until new financial assurance mechanisms are secured from the new owner and have been approved by the lead agency in accordance with Sections 2770, 2773.1, and 2773.4.
 Within 90 days of the sale or transfer of a surface mining operation, the new operator shall submit an appropriate financial assurance mechanism, which may be the existing mechanism if the existing mechanism is payable in the event of the new operator’s financial incapability or abandonment of the surface mining operation, that is subject to review by the lead agency and the supervisor pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2773.4. Within 15 days of the sale or transfer of a surface mining operation, the new operator shall sign a new statement of reclamation responsibility in accordance with paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 2772.

(d) The lead agency shall have primary responsibility to seek forfeiture of the financial assurance mechanisms and to reclaim mine sites pursuant to subdivision (b). However, if the board is not
 the lead agency pursuant to Section 2774.4, the supervisor may act to seek forfeiture of the financial assurance mechanisms and reclaim the mine sites pursuant to subdivision (b) only if both of the following occur:

(1) The financial incapability of the operator or the abandonment of the surface mining operation has come to the attention of the supervisor.

(2) The lead agency has been notified in writing by the supervisor of the financial incapability of the operator or the abandonment of the surface mining operation for at least 15 days, the lead agency has not taken appropriate measures to seek forfeiture
 of the financial assurance mechanisms and reclaim the mine site, and one of the following has occurred:

(A) The lead agency has been notified in writing by the
 supervisor that failure to take appropriate measures to seek forfeiture of the financial assurance mechanisms or to reclaim the mine site shall result in actions being taken against the lead agency under Section 2774.4.

(B) The supervisor determines that there is a violation that amounts to an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health, safety, or to the environment.

(C) The lead agency notifies the supervisor in writing that its good faith attempts to seek forfeiture of the financial assurance mechanisms have not been successful.

The supervisor shall comply with subdivision (b) in seeking the forfeiture of financial assurance mechanisms and reclaiming mine sites.

(e) The board may adopt regulations specifying financial assurance mechanisms other than surety bonds, irrevocable letters of credit, and trust funds, which the board determines are reasonably available and adequate to ensure reclamation pursuant to this chapter, but these mechanisms shall not include financial tests or surety bonds executed by one or more personal sureties. These mechanisms may include reclamation bond pool programs.

(f) The board shall adopt or revise guidelines to implement this section as necessary. The guidelines are exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and are not subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 38.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.1.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 2773.1, a financial assurance mechanism may include corporate financial tests combined with surety bonds, irrevocable letters of credit, or trust funds, as described in this section, that together ensure the completion of reclamation in accordance with the approved reclamation plan.

(b) (1) Corporate financial tests shall only be allowed after the board adopts a regulation that establishes a comprehensive analysis and test of a corporation’s financial status that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A minimum financial net worth of
 at least thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000), adjusted annually to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(B) Income.

(C) Liabilities, including other environmental assurances.

(D) Assets located within the United States.

(2) The regulation also shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Additional measures to provide the lead agency or the supervisor with the recovery of costs associated with the full collection and satisfaction of the financial assurance mechanisms.

(B) Requirements for corporate financial tests that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Provide for no more than 75 percent of the financial assurance cost estimate approved within the last year.

(ii) Be annually approved by both the lead agency and the supervisor.

(iii) Be able to be disallowed by either the lead agency or the supervisor.

(iv) Include an assessment from an independent certified public accountant using generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.

(c) Each surface mining
 operation shall have at least 25 percent of the financial assurance cost estimate in an acceptable financial assurance mechanism other than a corporate financial test if a qualifying corporation operates multiple surface mining operations.

(d) Subject to the requirements of this subdivision, an operator of multiple surface mining operations may use a corporate financial test that combines the financial assurance cost estimates of each surface mining operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 39.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.15.

Notwithstanding Section 2773.1, a surety bond that was executed by any personal surety that was approved by the lead agency prior to February 13, 1998, to ensure that reclamation is performed in accordance with a reclamation plan approved by a lead agency prior to that date, may be utilized to satisfy the requirements of this chapter, if the amount of the financial assurance required to perform the approved reclamation plan, as amended or updated from time to time, does not change from the amount approved prior to February 13, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 643, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.2.

The mineral owner and owner of the surface estate, if legally entitled to do so, shall allow access to the property on which the mining operation is located to any governmental agency or the agent of any company providing financial assurances in connection with the reclamation plan and expending those financial assurances for reclamation, in order that reclamation may be carried out by the governmental agency or company, in accordance with the reclamation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.3.

(a) In addition to other reclamation plan requirements of this chapter and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter, a lead agency may not approve a reclamation plan for a surface mining operation for gold, silver, copper, or other metallic minerals or financial assurances for the operation, if the operation is located on, or within one mile of, any Native American sacred site and is located in an area of special concern, unless both of the following criteria are met:

(1) The reclamation plan requires that all excavations be backfilled and graded to do both of the following:

(A) Achieve
 the approximate original contours of the mined lands prior to mining.

(B) Grade all mined materials that are in excess of the materials that can be placed back into excavated areas, including, but not limited to, all overburden, spoil piles, and heap leach piles, over the project site to achieve the approximate original contours of the mined lands prior to mining.

(2) The financial assurance cost estimates are sufficient in amount to provide for the backfilling and grading required by paragraph (1).

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following
 meanings:

(1) “Native American sacred site” means a specific area that is identified by a federally recognized Indian Tribe, Rancheria or Mission Band of Indians, or by the Native American Heritage Commission, as sacred by virtue of its established historical or cultural significance to, or ceremonial use by, a Native American group, including, but not limited to, any area containing a prayer circle, shrine, petroglyph, or spirit break, or a path or area linking the circle, shrine, petroglyph, or spirit break with another circle, shrine, petroglyph, or spirit break.

(2) “Area of special concern” means any area in the California desert that is designated as Class C or Class L lands or as an Area of Critical Environmental Concern under the
 California Desert Conservation Area Plan of 1980, as amended, by the United States Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management, pursuant to Section 1781 of Title 43 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 40.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.4.

(a) (1) Prior to approving the financial assurance cost estimate for a new reclamation plan or adjustments to the financial assurance cost estimate based on an amendment to a reclamation plan, the lead agency shall submit the financial assurance cost estimate to the supervisor for review.

(2) The lead agency shall provide the supervisor with a determination that the financial assurance cost estimate submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) is adequate, complete, and consistent with Section 2773.1, Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s financial assurance guidelines
 adopted pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2773.1.

(3) All documentation submitted to the supervisor pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted at one time.

(b) No later than 15 days after receiving a financial assurance cost estimate, the supervisor shall notify the lead agency and the operator if the submission is incomplete. An incomplete submission is one that does not meet the content requirements of Section 2773.1, Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s financial assurance guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2773.1. The supervisor’s notice shall specifically identify all aspects of the submission that are incomplete. The supervisor’s
 time to review the financial assurance cost estimate shall commence upon the receipt of a submission that contains the aspects identified in the supervisor’s notice to the lead agency.

(c) (1) The supervisor shall have 45 days from the date of receipt of a complete financial assurance cost estimate to prepare written comments if the supervisor chooses.

(2) The lead agency shall evaluate written comments received from the supervisor relating to the financial assurance cost estimate within a reasonable amount of time. The lead agency shall prepare a written response to the supervisor’s comments describing the disposition of the major issues raised by the supervisor’s comments.

(3) The lead agency shall submit
 its proposed response to the supervisor at least 30 days prior to approval of the financial assurance cost estimate. The lead agency’s response shall include either of the following:

(A) A description of how the lead agency proposes to adopt the
 supervisor’s comments to the financial assurance cost estimate.

(B) A detailed description of the reasons why the lead agency proposes to not adopt the supervisor’s comments.

(4) Copies of any written comments received and responses prepared by the lead agency shall be forwarded to the operator.

(5) (A) If the lead agency, in its written response to the supervisor’s comments, proposes to not adopt the supervisor’s comments relating to the financial assurance cost estimate, the supervisor, within 15 days of receipt of the lead agency’s written response, may request in writing a consultation with the lead agency to discuss the supervisor’s comments and the lead agency’s response. The request
 shall include an invitation to the operator to participate in the consultation. The consultation may be conducted in person, electronically, telephonically, or by any means convenient to the parties.

(B) If the supervisor requests a consultation pursuant to this subdivision, the lead agency shall not approve the financial assurance cost estimate until after consulting with the supervisor. The consultation shall occur not later than 30 days after the supervisor’s request unless an alternate timeframe is mutually agreed upon by the supervisor, lead agency, and operator.

(6) (A) The lead agency shall give the supervisor at least 30 days’ notice of the time, place, and date of the hearing at which the financial assurance cost estimate is scheduled to be approved by
 the lead agency. If no hearing is required by this chapter, local ordinance, or other state law, then the lead agency shall provide 30 days’ notice to the supervisor that it intends to approve the financial assurance cost estimate.

(B) The lead agency shall send to the supervisor its final response to the supervisor’s comments within 30 days following its approval of the financial assurance cost estimate, during which time the Division of Mine Reclamation retains all of its powers, duties, and authority pursuant to this chapter.

(d) (1) (A) Within 30 days of an annual inspection being conducted pursuant to Section 2774, an operator shall provide an annual financial assurance cost estimate to the lead agency for review.

(B) If the lead agency fails to cause the inspection of the surface mining operation on the date requested by the operator pursuant to Section 2207 or on the date set by the lead agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2774, the operator shall provide an annual financial assurance cost estimate to the lead agency for review within 30 days of the applicable inspection date, unless the lead agency causes the inspection to occur within that time period, in which case the operator shall provide an annual financial assurance cost estimate to the lead agency within 30 days of the date of the inspection.

(2) (A) Within 60 days of receiving an operator’s annual financial assurance cost estimate, the lead agency shall do one of the following:

(i) Deny the financial assurance cost estimate pursuant to
 paragraph (6).

(ii) Submit the financial assurance cost estimate to the supervisor for review.

(B) The lead agency shall provide the supervisor with a determination that the annual financial assurance cost estimate submitted is adequate, complete, and consistent with Section 2773.1, Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s financial assurance guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2773.1.

(3) All documentation submitted to the supervisor pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted at one time.

(4) Within
 15 days of receiving an annual financial assurance cost estimate, the supervisor shall notify the lead agency and the operator if the submission is incomplete. An incomplete submission is one that does not meet the content requirements of Section 2773.1, Article 11 (commencing with Section 3800) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s financial assurance guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2773.1. The supervisor’s notice shall specifically identify all aspects of the submission that are incomplete. The supervisor’s time to review the annual financial assurance cost estimate shall commence upon the receipt of a submission that contains the aspects identified in the supervisor’s notice to the lead agency.

(5) (A) Within 45 days of
 receiving an operator’s complete annual financial assurance cost estimate from the lead agency, the
 supervisor shall prepare written comments on the operator’s annual financial assurance cost estimate and provide the comments to the lead agency and the operator if the supervisor so chooses.

(B) (i) Within 30 days from receiving the supervisor’s written comments pursuant to this subdivision, the lead agency shall evaluate the written comments and provide the supervisor and operator its proposed response to the supervisor.

(ii) The lead agency shall submit its proposed response to the supervisor at least 30 days prior to approving the annual financial assurance cost estimate. The lead agency’s response shall include either of the following:

(I) A description of how the lead agency proposes
 to adopt the
 supervisor’s comments to the annual financial assurance cost estimate.

(II) A detailed description of the reasons why the lead agency proposes not to adopt the supervisor’s comments.

(iii) Copies of any written comments received and responses prepared by the lead agency pursuant to this subparagraph shall be provided to the operator.

(C) (i) If the lead agency, in its written response to the
 supervisor’s comments, proposes to not adopt the supervisor’s comments concerning the annual financial assurance cost estimate, the supervisor, within 15 days of receipt of the lead agency’s written response, may request in writing a consultation with the lead agency to discuss the supervisor’s comments and the lead agency’s response. The request shall include an invitation to the operator to participate in the consultation. The consultation may be conducted in person, electronically, telephonically, or by any means convenient to the parties.

(ii) If the supervisor requests a consultation pursuant to this subparagraph, the lead agency shall not approve the annual financial assurance cost estimate until after consulting with the supervisor. The consultation shall occur not later than 30 days after the supervisor’s request
 unless an alternate timeframe is mutually
 agreed upon by the supervisor, lead agency, and operator.

(D) (i) Within 60 days of receiving the supervisor’s written comments, or of a consultation pursuant to this subdivision, whichever is later or the due date of the supervisor’s written comments if none are received, the lead agency shall approve or deny an operator’s annual financial assurance cost estimate.

(ii) The lead agency shall give the supervisor at least 30 days’ notice of the time, place, and date of the hearing at which the annual financial assurance cost estimate is scheduled to be approved by the lead agency.

(iii) If no hearing is required by this chapter, local ordinance, or other state law, the lead agency shall
 provide 30 days’ notice to the supervisor that it intends to approve the annual financial assurance cost estimate.

(E) Within 30 days of the lead agency’s approval of the annual financial assurance cost estimate, the lead agency shall send the
 supervisor its final response to the supervisor’s comments.

(6) If the lead agency determines an operator’s annual financial assurance cost estimate is inadequate, the lead agency shall specify the reasons for that determination. The operator shall have 30 days to appeal that denial pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2770 or provide a revised financial assurance cost estimate incorporating the suggested changes to the lead agency for approval by the lead agency pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) Within 30 days of the lead agency’s approval of a financial assurance cost estimate pursuant to this section, the operator shall provide the lead agency and the supervisor an appropriate financial assurance mechanism.

(2) (A) Within 15 days of receiving a financial assurance mechanism pursuant to this subdivision, or subdivision (c) of Section 2773.1 the lead agency and the supervisor shall review the financial assurance mechanism to determine if the type of mechanism, including the release instructions, meets the requirements of this chapter.

(B) Financial assurance mechanisms determined to be noncompliant with this chapter shall be returned to the operator with instructions on how to correct the type or release instructions of the financial assurance mechanism.

(3) By July 1, 2018, the board shall adopt forms to implement this subdivision as necessary. The forms shall be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(f) The review and approval of financial assurances pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered a project for the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 41.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.5.

Section 2773.3 does not apply to either of the following:

(a) Any surface mining operation in existence on January 1, 2003, for which the lead agency has issued final approval of a reclamation plan and the financial assurances prior to September 1, 2002.

(b) Any amended reclamation plan or financial assurances that are necessary for the continued operation or expansion of a surface mining operation in existence on January 1, 2003, that otherwise satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1154, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative April 7, 2003, pursuant to Stats. 2003, Ch. 3, Secs. 2 and 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.

(a) Every lead agency shall adopt ordinances in accordance with state policy that establish procedures for the review and approval of reclamation plans and financial assurances and the issuance of a permit to conduct surface mining operations, except that any lead agency without an active surface mining operation in its jurisdiction may defer adopting an implementing ordinance until the filing of a permit application. The ordinances shall establish procedures requiring at least one public hearing and shall be periodically reviewed by the lead agency and revised, as necessary, to ensure that the ordinances continue to be in accordance with state policy.

(b) (1) The lead agency shall cause surface mining operations to be inspected in intervals of no more than 12 months, solely to determine whether the surface mining operation is in compliance with this chapter. The lead agency shall cause an inspection to be conducted by a state-licensed geologist, state-licensed civil engineer, state-licensed landscape architect, state-licensed forester, or a qualified lead agency employee who has not been employed by the surface mining operation being inspected in any capacity during the previous 12 months, except that a qualified lead agency employee may inspect surface mining operations conducted by the local agency. All inspections shall be conducted using a form developed by the Division of Mine Reclamation and approved by the board that includes the professional licensing and disciplinary information of the person who conducted the inspection. The operator
 shall be solely responsible for the reasonable cost of the inspection. The lead agency shall provide a notice of completion of inspection to the supervisor within 90 days of conducting the inspection. The notice shall contain a statement regarding the surface mining operation’s compliance with this chapter and a copy of the completed inspection form, and shall specify, as applicable, all of the following:

(A) Aspects of the surface mining operation, if any, that were found to be inconsistent with this chapter but were corrected before the submission of the inspection form to the supervisor.

(B) Aspects of the surface mining operation, if any, that were found to be inconsistent with this chapter but were not corrected before the submission of the inspection form to the supervisor.

(C) A statement describing the lead agency’s intended response to any aspects of the surface mining operation found to be inconsistent with this chapter but were not corrected before the submission of the inspection form to the supervisor.

(D) A statement as to whether the surface mining operation is out of compliance with an order to comply or stipulated order to comply issued by the lead agency. 

(2) If the surface mining operation has a review of its reclamation plan, financial assurances, or an interim management plan pending under subdivision (b) or (h) of Section 2770, or an appeal pending before the board or lead agency governing body under subdivision (e) or (h) of Section 2770, the notice shall so indicate.
 The lead agency shall forward to the operator a copy of the notice, a copy of the completed inspection form, and any supporting documentation, including, but not limited to, any inspection report prepared by the geologist, civil engineer, landscape architect, forester, or qualified lead agency employee who conducted the inspection.

(c) If an operator does not request an inspection date on the annual report filed pursuant to Section 2207 or if the lead agency is unable to cause the inspection of a given surface mining operation on the date requested by the operator, the lead agency shall provide the operator with a minimum of five days’ written notice of a pending inspection or a lesser time period if agreed to by the operator.

(d) (1) No later than December
 31, 2017, the Division of Mine Reclamation shall establish a training program for all surface mine inspectors. The program shall be designed to include a guidance document, developed by the Division of Mine Reclamation, in consultation with the board and stakeholders, to provide instruction and recommendations to surface mine inspectors performing inspections pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The training program shall include inspection workshops offered by the Division of Mine Reclamation in different regions of the state to provide practical application of the guidance document material.

(3) On and after July 1, 2020, all inspectors shall have on file with the lead agency and the Division of Mine Reclamation a certificate of completion of an inspection workshop. An inspector shall
 attend a workshop no later than five years after the date of his or her most recent certificate.
